Utah statutes.
41-6a-904.   Approaching emergency vehicle -- Necessary signals -- Stationary emergency vehicle -- Duties of respective operators.

(1) Except when otherwise directed by a peace officer, the operator of a vehicle, upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle using audible or visual signals under Section 41-6a-212 or 41-6a-1625, shall:

(a)  yield the right-of-way and immediately move to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the highway, clear of any intersection; and

(b)  then stop and remain stopped until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed.

(2)  The operator of a vehicle, upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency vehicle that is displaying alternately flashing red, red and white, or red and blue lights, shall:

(a)  reduce the speed of the vehicle;

(b)  provide as much space as practical to the stationary authorized emergency vehicle; and

(c)  if traveling in a lane adjacent to the stationary authorized emergency vehicle and if practical, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, make a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the authorized emergency vehicle.

(3)  The operator of a vehicle, upon approaching a stationary tow truck or highway maintenance vehicle that is displaying flashing amber lights, shall:

(a)  reduce the speed of the vehicle; and

(b)  provide as much space as practical to the stationary tow truck or highway maintenance vehicle.

(4)  This section does not relieve the operator of an authorized emergency vehicle, tow truck, or highway maintenance vehicle from the duty to drive with regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

